Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6117.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "health care cost reduction fund act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (b) "Fund" means the health care cost reduction fund created in section 5. (c) "Grant program" means the health care cost grant program created in the hospital cost review board act. Sec. 5. (1) The health care cost reduction fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit civil fines and assessments recovered under the hospital cost review board act, the health facility consolidation prevention act, and money received from any other source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. Sec. 7. The department shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, only to implement and administer the grant program. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 6116 (request no. H06007'26). (b) House Bill No. 6118 (request no. H06780'26).